Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 17.30.900.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions set out in AS

11.71.900

apply to this chapter.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.30.160. Renumbered in 1982.

Collateral references. —

Marijuana, psilocybin, peyote or similar drugs of vegetable origin as narcotics for purposes of drug prosecution, 50 ALR3d 1164.